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DTC P06 17StarterRelayCircuitHigh

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
While the engine is being cranked, the battery positive voltage is applied to terminal STA of the engine control
ECU.
If the vehicle is being driven and the engine control ECU detects the starter control signal (STA), the engine
control ECU concludes that the starter control circuit is malfunctioning. The engine control ECU will turn on
the MIL and a DTC is set.
Thismonitor runswhen thevehicle isdrivenat20km/h ( 12mph) forover20seconds.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0617

When all conditions (a), (b) and (c) are satisfied for 20 seconds
withbattery (+B)voltage 10.5Vormore
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)Vehiclespeed 20km/h ( 12.4mph)
(b)Engine revolution 1,000 rpm
(c) STA signal ON
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditionswhen
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,aswell asother
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.
Whenusinghand −held tester:

1 Connecthand −held tester,andcheckSTAsignal.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchON,andpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / STARTER SIG.
CHECK:
Read theSTAsignalon thehand −held testerwhile thestarteroperates.
OK:

Ignition Switch Position ON START

STA Signal OFF ON

OK Go to step 5.

NG

2Checkpark/neutralpositionswitch(SeePub.No.RM970E,pageDI −32).

NG Repair or replace park/neutral position switch.
Go to next step 3 after the replacement.

OK

3Check ignitionswitch(SeePub.No.RM6 16E,pageBE −20).

NG Replace ignition switch.
Go the next step 4 after the replacement.

OK
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4 Connect hand−held tester, and check STA signal.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON, and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL / STARTER SIG.
CHECK:
Read the STA signal on the hand−held tester while the starter operates.
OK:

Ignition Switch Position ON START

STA Signal OFF ON

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check DTC reoccur.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Clear DTC (See page DI−3) .
(d) Drive the vehicle more than 40 km/h (25 mph) for 20 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Check DTC reoccur.
RESULT:

Display (DTC output) Proceed to

P0617 A

No DTC output B

A Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E,pageFI −74).

B

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−3) .
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When not using hand−held tester:

1 Check voltage between terminal STA of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal STA of the engine con-
trol ECU connector and the body ground, while cranking the en-
gine (ignition switch START position) and while not engine
cranking the engine (ignition switch position ON).
OK:

Voltage:
6 V or more (ignition switch START position)
0 V (ignition switch ON position)

OK Go to step 5.

NG

2 Check park/neutral position switch (See Pub. No. RM970E, page DI−32).

NG Replace park/neutral position switch.
Go to next step 5 after the replacement.

OK

3 Check ignition switch (See Pub. No. RM616E, page BE−20).

NG Replace ignition switch.
Go to next step 5 after the replacement.

OK
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4 Check voltage between terminal STA of engine control ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal STA of the engine con-
trol ECU connector and the body ground, while cranking the en-
gine ( ignit ion swit ch START posit ion) and while not engine
cranking the engine (ignition switch position ON).
OK:

Voltage:
6 V or more (ignition switch START position)
0 V (ignition switch ON position)

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check DTC reoccur.

PREPARATION:
(a) Clear DTC (See page DI−3) .
(b) Drive the vehicle more than 40 km/h (25 mph) for 20 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Check DTC reoccur.
RESULT:

Display (DTC output) Proceed to

P0617/89 A

No DTC output B

A Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).

B

Check for intermittent problems (See page
DI−3) .


